Utah statutes.
4-39-501.   Enforcement and penalties.
(1)  Any violation of this chapter is a class B misdemeanor and may be grounds
for revocation of the license or denial of any future license as determined by
the department.
(2)  A violation of any rule made under this chapter may be grounds for
revocation of the license or denial for future licenses as determined by the
department.
